Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
539]

UNIFORM
TRANSFER-ON-DEATH (TOD)

SECURITY
REGISTRATION ACT

Section

539-1 Definitions

539-2 Registration in beneficiary form; sole or
joint tenancy

ownership

539-3 Registration in beneficiary form; applicable
law

539-4 Origination of registration in beneficiary
form

539-5 Form of registration in beneficiary form

539-6 Effect of registration in beneficiary form

539-7 Ownership on death of owner

539-8 Protection of registering entity

539-9 Nontestamentary transfer on death

539-10 Terms, conditions, and forms for
registration

539-11 Short title; rules of construction

539-12 Application of chapter

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next